Massachusetts, session 194th, H994.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There is sound scientific evidence to conclude that nitrogen and phosphorus
in fertilizers are contaminants that negatively affect fresh and salt waters when present in
excessive amounts. These excessive amounts of nitrogen and phosphorus contribute to
undesirable algae and aquatic plant growth within all Orleans water bodies. This undesirable
algae and aquatic plant growth has an adverse effect on public health through the degradation of
waters used for drinking water, shell fishing, and recreational swimming and boating.
SECTION 2. It is necessary to prohibit the application of fertilizer that contains
phosphorus and nitrogen so as to improve the water quality of the Town of Orleans. The soils of
Orleans are unique insofar as Orleans has significant amounts of coarse, sandy soils that are
of 2

subject to rapid water infiltration, percolation and leaching of nutrients, and such unique local
conditions require that Orleans prohibit the application of nitrogen and phosphorus added to soils
through the application of fertilizers. This act should help Orleans to achieve compliance with
the Total Maximum Daily Loads (TMDL) prescribed by the Commonwealth of Massachusetts
for nitrogen and phosphorus in its waters.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, including but
not limited to any general or special law conferring exclusive authority upon the Department of
Agriculture to regulate and control the application of fertilizers elsewhere in the Commonwealth,
the application of fertilizer containing nitrogen or phosphorus, or any other pollutants in the town
of Orleans is prohibited, except for the purposes of commercial agricultural and the residential
use of certified organic fertilizer with low nitrogen and phosphorus for the use in growing fruits
and vegetables that is allowable under the USDA National Organic Program organic standards
(OMRI listed).
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 2